District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

48-1001

Definitions.

Repealed.

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-270, § 2, 43 DCR 4493
May 6, 2015, D.C. Law 20-274, § 3, 61 DCR 12117
1981 Ed., § 33-581.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see §§ 2-6 of the Anti-Loitering/Drug Free Zone Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-278, May 29, 1996, 43 DCR 2974),§§ 2-6 of the Anti-Loitering/Drug Free Zone Legislative Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-319, July 31, 1996, 43 DCR 4487), §§ 2-6 of the Anti-Loitering/Drug Free Zone Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-426, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6331), §§ 2-6 of the Anti-Loitering/Drug Free Zone Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-468, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 175), and §§ 2-6 of the Anti-Loitering/Drug Free Zone Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-55, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2219).